Missouri, session 2026, HB2213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.406, to read as follows:
9.406. April twenty-seventh each year is hereby designated as "Ulysses S. Grant
2 Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to celebrate the life of the Civil War general and eighteenth
4 president of the United States, who made his home in St. Louis, Missouri, in the years
5 following his graduation from West Point and before the Civil War.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.